Missouri, session 2026, SB1034.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 242.030, 242.270, 242.280, 242.500,
245.020, 245.125, 245.130, 245.197, and 245.300, RSMo, are
repealed and nine new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 242.030, 242.270, 242.280, 242.500, 245.020,
245.125, 245.130, 245.197, and 245.300, to read as follows:
242.030. 1. Immediately after such articles of
association shall have been filed, the clerk in whose office
the articles of association have been filed shall give
notice by causing publication to be made once a week for
four consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in each
county in which are situate lands and other property of the
district, the last insertion to be made at least fifteen
days prior to the first day of the next regular term of the
circuit court at which said articles of association and
petition are to be heard; said notice shall be substantially
in the following form and it shall be deemed sufficient for
all purposes of sections 242.010 to 242.690:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1034 2
NOTICE OF APPLICATION TO FORM DRAINAGE
DISTRICT.
Notice is hereby given to all persons
interested [in the following described real
estate and other property] in ______ County
of Missouri [(here describe the property as
set out in the articles of association)] that
articles of association asking that [the
foregoing] lands and other property be formed
into a drainage district under the provisions
of chapter 242, and that the lands and other
property [as above described] will be
affected by the formation of said drainage
district and be rendered liable to taxation
for the purposes of paying the expenses of
organizing and making and maintaining the
improvements that may be found necessary to
drain, protect and reclaim the lands and
other property in said district, and you, and
each of you, are hereby notified to appear at
a session of this court to be held on the
______ day of ______, 20______, at ______ in
______ County, and show cause, if any there
be, why said drainage district as set forth
in the articles of association shall not be
organized as a public corporation of the
state of Missouri.
__________________
Clerk of the circuit court of ______ County.
2. Within fourteen days of the filing of the articles,
those petitioning for the creation of the district shall
mail a copy of the notice contained in this section to the
names as listed on the county assessor's records of the
owners of land identified in the petition or other
individual or corporate franchise property in the district

SB 1034 3
identified in the petition, including all public entities
owning land within the district.
3. The circuit court of the county in which said
articles of association have been filed shall thereafter
maintain and have original and exclusive jurisdiction
coextensive with the boundaries and limits of said district
without regard to county lines, for all purposes of sections
242.010 to 242.690; provided, that where lands in different
counties are sought to be incorporated in the same district,
[it shall not be necessary to include all of the lands and
other property in said proposed drainage district in the
notice published in the different counties, but only such
lands and other property in the district as are situate in
the respective counties] said notice shall be published in
some newspaper in each county in which such lands so
affected are situate.
242.270. Upon the filing of the report of the
commissioners, the clerk of said circuit court shall give
notice thereof by causing publication to be made once a week
for [three] four consecutive weeks in some newspaper,
published in each county in the district. It shall not be
necessary for said clerk to name the parties interested, but
it shall be sufficient to say:
NOTICE OF FILING OF COMMISSIONERS' REPORT
FOR ______ DRAINAGE DISTRICT.
[Notice is hereby given to all persons
interested in the following described land
and property in ______ County (or counties)
Missouri (here describe land and property)
included within "______ drainage district"
that the commissioners heretofore appointed
to assess benefits and damages to the

SB 1034 4
property and lands situate in said drainage
district and to appraise the cash value of
the land necessary to be taken for rights-
of-way, holding basins and other works of
said district within or without the limits
of said district, filed their report in this
office on the ______ day of ______,
20______, and you and each of you are hereby
notified that you may examine said report
and file exceptions to all or any part
thereof, as provided by law,] You are hereby
notified that the commissioners heretofore
appointed to assess benefits to the property
and lands situated in said drainage district
filed their report in this office on the
______ day of ______, 20______. You, and
each of you, are hereby notified that the
report may provide for assessments on your
property, and that you may examine said
report and file exceptions to all or any
part thereof within thirty days from this
mailing and appear at the hearing which will
be scheduled no sooner than thirty days
after the date of this notice, as provided
by law. Please be aware no further appeal
is allowed to dispute assessed benefits. If
you are receiving this notice by mail,
county records indicate you are the owner of
property which is located within the
_________ Drainage District.
The district last performed an assessment in
________ and the assessed benefits may
significantly change based on changed use
and improvement of the property and new or
improved drainage projects.
__________________

SB 1034 5
Clerk of the circuit court of ______ County,
Missouri.
Provided, that where lands in different counties are
contained in said report, the said notice shall be published
in some newspaper in each county in which such lands so
affected are situate[, and it shall not be necessary to
publish a list of all of said lands in each county, but only
that part of same situate in the respective counties].
242.280. 1. The drainage district or any owner of
land or other property in said district, may file exceptions
to said report or to any assessment for either benefits or
damages, within [ten] thirty days after the last day of
publication of the notice provided for in the preceding
section. All exceptions shall be heard by the court and
determined in a summary manner so as to carry out liberally
the purposes and needs of the district, and if it appears to
the satisfaction of the court, after having heard and
determined all of said exceptions, that the estimated cost
of constructing the improvement contemplated in the plan for
reclamation is less than the benefits assessed against the
land and other property in said district, then the court
shall approve and confirm said commissioners' report as so
modified and amended.
2. The court may at any time before final confirmation
or approval refer the report back to the commissioners with
or without instructions, and when the report is again filed,
notice shall be given in the form and for the time provided
in section 242.270. Exceptions to the second report shall be
filed within [ten] thirty days after the date of the last

SB 1034 6
day of publication, and heard and determined in a summary
manner.
3. The court shall adjudge and apportion the costs
incurred by the exceptions filed and shall condemn any land
or other property, within or without the boundary lines of
the district, that is shown by the report of the
commissioners to be needed for rights-of-way, holding basins
and other works, or that may be needed for material to be
used in constructing said works, following, as nearly as
possible, the procedure that is now provided for by law for
the appropriation of land and other property taken for
telegraph, telephone and railroad rights-of-way.
4. The clerk of said circuit court shall transmit a
certified copy of the court decree and copy of the
commissioners' report, as confirmed or amended by the court,
to the secretary of the board of supervisors of the
district, who shall make and transmit a certified copy of
the said decree and that part of the said report affecting
land in each county to the recorder of each county having
lands in the district, or affected by the said report, where
the same shall become a permanent record and each such
recorder shall receive a fee of one dollar for receiving,
filing and preserving the same.
5. Any person may appeal from the judgment of the
court, and upon such appeal there may be determined either
or both of the following questions: First, whether just
compensation has been allowed for property appropriated and,
second, whether proper damages have been allowed for
property prejudicially affected by the improvements.
242.500. 1. Whenever the board of supervisors of any
district in existence as of August 28, 2008, or organized
under this chapter after August 28, 2008, on behalf of the

SB 1034 7
district, or the owners of twenty-five percent or more of
the acreage of the lands in the district shall file a
petition with the circuit clerk in whose office the articles
of association were filed, stating that there has been a
material change in the values of all or some of the property
in the district since the last previous assessment of
benefits or readjustment of the assessment of benefits and
praying for a readjustment of the assessment of benefits of
the property identified in the petition for the purpose of
making a more equitable basis for the levy of the
maintenance tax or for the purpose of levying a new tax to
pay the costs of the completion of the proposed works and
improvements as shown in the supplemental plan for
reclamation adopted by the board of supervisors pursuant to
section 242.230, or for both of the aforesaid purposes, the
circuit clerk shall give notice of the filing and hearing of
the petition in the manner and for the time provided for in
section 242.030. The notice may be in the following form:
[Notice is hereby given to all persons
interested in the lands and property included
within the ______ district that a petition
has been filed in the office of the clerk of
the circuit court of ______ County, ______,
praying for a readjustment of the assessment
of benefits of all or some of the property in
the district as identified in the petition
for the purpose(s) of ______, and that the
petition will be heard by the circuit court
on the ______ day of ______, 20______] You
are hereby notified that a petition has been
filed in the office of the clerk of the
circuit court of ______ County, Missouri,
praying for a readjustment of the assessment
of benefits for the purpose(s) of ______ and
that the petition will be heard by the

SB 1034 8
circuit court on the ______ day of ______,
20______. At this hearing, the court will
consider the appointment of commissioners to
perform the readjustment of the assessment of
benefits. Once this report is submitted to
the court, landowners may file objections
which shall be heard and determined by the
court. If you are receiving this notice by
mail, county records indicate you are the
owner of property within the ______ Drainage
District.
The district last performed an assessment in
________ and the assessed benefits may
significantly change based on a number of
factors including changed use or improvement
of the property since that time. Please be
aware this is a special assessment.
Therefore, the assessed benefits are the base
formula used in allocating the financial
burden for maintenance and improvement of
district improvements.
______,
Clerk of the circuit court ______ County
Upon hearing of the petition if the court finds that there
has been a material change in the values of some or all of
the property in the district as identified in the petition
since the last previous assessment of benefits, the court
shall order that there be made a readjustment of the
assessment of benefits for the lands identified in the
petition for the purpose of providing a basis upon which to
levy the maintenance tax of the district or for the purpose
of levying a new tax to pay the costs of the completion of

SB 1034 9
the proposed works and improvements as shown in the
supplemental plan for reclamation adopted by the board of
supervisors pursuant to section 242.230, or for both of the
aforesaid purposes.
2. Thereupon the court shall appoint three
commissioners, possessing the qualifications of
commissioners appointed under section 242.240 to make such
readjustment of assessments in the manner provided in
section 242.260 with respect to the lands identified in the
petition and the commissioners shall make their report, and
the same proceedings shall be had thereon, as nearly as may
be, as are herein provided for the assessment of benefits
accruing for original construction; provided, that in making
the readjustment of the assessment of benefits, the
commissioners shall not be limited to the aggregate amount
of the original or any readjustment of the assessment of
benefits, and may assess the amount of benefits that will
accrue from carrying out and putting into effect such
supplemental plan for reclamation adopted by the board of
supervisors pursuant to section 242.230. After the making
of such readjustment, the limitation of twenty percent of
the annual maintenance tax which may be levied shall apply
to the amount of benefits as readjusted, and the limitation
of the tax which may be levied for payment of the costs of
the completion of the proposed works and improvements as
shown in the aforesaid supplemental plan for reclamation
shall apply to the amount of the benefits as readjusted.
There shall be no such readjustment of benefits oftener than
once in a year. The list of lands, and other property, with
100 the readjusted assessed benefits and the decree and judgment
101 of the court, shall be filed in the office of the county
102 recorder as provided in section 242.280.

SB 1034 10
245.020. 1. After such articles of association shall
have been filed, the clerk in whose office the articles of
association have been filed shall give notice by causing
publication to be made once a week for four consecutive
weeks in some newspaper published in each county in which
the land and other property of the district are situate.
Such notice shall be published within fourteen days of
filing of the articles, and the notice shall be
substantially in the following form and it shall be deemed
sufficient for all purposes of sections 245.010 to 245.280:
NOTICE OF APPLICATION TO FORM LEVEE DISTRICT.
Notice is hereby given to all persons
interested [in the following described real
estate and other property] in ______ County of
Missouri [(here describe the property as set
out in the articles of association)] that
articles of association asking that [the
foregoing] lands and other property be formed
into a levee district under the provisions of
sections 245.010 to 245.280, RSMo, have been
filed in this office, and the foregoing real
estate and other property will be affected by
the formation of said levee district and be
rendered liable to taxation for the purposes
of paying the expenses of organizing and
making and maintaining the improvements that
may be found necessary to effect the leveeing
and reclamation of the land and other property
in said district, and you and each of you may
file objections or exceptions to said articles
of association and petition on or before the
______ day of ______, 20______, in this
office, but not thereafter, if any there be,
why said levee district as set forth in the
articles of association shall not be organized

SB 1034 11
as a public corporation of the state of
Missouri.
__________________ ,
Clerk of circuit court of ______ County.
The circuit court of the county in which said articles of
association have been filed shall thereafter maintain and
have original and exclusive jurisdiction coextensive with
the boundaries and limits of said district without regard to
county lines, for all purposes of this law; provided, that
where lands in different counties are sought to be
incorporated in the same district, [it shall not be
necessary to include all of the lands in said proposed levee
district in the notice published in the different counties,
but only such lands and other property in the district as
are situate in the respective counties] said notice shall be
published in some newspaper in each county in which such
lands so affected are situate.
2. Within fourteen days of the filing of the articles,
those petitioning for the creation of the district shall
mail[, by certified mail,] a copy of the notice contained in
this section to the names as listed on the county assessor's
records of the owners of land identified in the petition or
other individual or corporate franchise property in the
district identified in the petition, including all public
entities owning land within the district.
245.125. Upon the filing of the report of the
commissioners, the clerk of said circuit court shall give
notice thereof by causing publication to be made once in
some newspaper published in each county in the district. It

SB 1034 12
shall not be necessary for said clerk to name the parties
interested, but it shall be sufficient to say:
NOTICE FOR FILING OF COMMISSIONERS' REPORT
For ______ Levee District.
[Notice is hereby given to all persons
interested in the following described land
and property in ______ County (or counties),
Missouri (here describe land and property),
included within "______ levee district" that
the commissioners heretofore appointed to
assess benefits and damages to the property
and lands situated in said levee district and
to appraise the cash value of the land
necessary to be taken for rights-of-way, and
other works of said district within or
without the limits of said district, filed
their report in this office on the ______ day
of ______, 20______, and you, and each of
you, are hereby notified that you may examine
said report and file exceptions to all or any
part thereof, as provided by law] You are
hereby notified that the commissioners
heretofore appointed to assess benefits to
the property and lands situated in said levee
district filed their report in this office on
the ______ day of ______, 20______. You, and
each of you, are hereby notified that the
report may provide for assessments on your
property, and that you may examine said
report and file exceptions to all or any part
thereof within thirty days from this mailing
and appear at the hearing which will be
scheduled no sooner than thirty days after
the date of this notice, as provided by law.
Please be aware no further appeal is allowed
to dispute assessed benefits. If you are
receiving this notice by mail, county records

SB 1034 13
indicate you are the owner of property which
is located within the _________ Levee
District.
The district last performed an assessment in
________ and the assessed benefits may
significantly change based on changed use and
improvement of the property and new or
improved levee projects.
__________________ ,
Clerk of the circuit court of ______ County,
Missouri.
Provided, that where lands in different counties are
contained in said report, the said notice shall be published
in some newspaper in each county in which such lands so
affected are situate[, and it shall not be necessary to
publish a list of all of said lands in each county, but only
that part of same situate in the respective counties]. The
commissioners shall mail[, by certified mail,] a copy of the
notice contained in this section to the parties contained in
subsection 2 of section 245.020 within one week of filing
the report.
245.130. 1. The levee district or any owner of land
or other property in said district, may file exceptions to
said report or to any assessment for either benefits or
damages, within [ten] thirty days after the last day of
publication of the notice provided for in section 245.125.
2. All exceptions shall be heard by the court and
determined in a summary manner so as to carry out liberally
the purposes and needs of the district, and if it appears to

SB 1034 14
the satisfaction of the court, after having heard and
determined all of said exceptions, that the estimated cost
of constructing the improvement contemplated in the plan for
reclamation is less than the benefits assessed against the
land and other property in said district, then the court
shall approve and confirm said commissioners' report as so
modified and amended. The court shall adjudge and apportion
the costs incurred by the exceptions filed and shall condemn
any land or other property, within or without the boundary
lines of the district, that is shown by the report of the
commissioners to be needed for rights-of-way, holding basins
and other works, or that may be needed for material to be
used in constructing said works, following, as nearly as
possible the procedure that is now provided for by law for
the appropriation of land and other property taken for
telegraph, telephone and railroad rights-of-way.
3. The clerk of said circuit court shall transmit a
certified copy of the court decree and copy of the
commissioners' report, as confirmed or amended by the court,
to the secretary of the board of supervisors of the
district, who shall make and transmit a certified copy of
the said decree and that part of the said report affecting
land in each county to the recorder of each county having
lands in the district, or affected by the said report, where
the same shall become a permanent record and each such
recorder shall receive a fee of one dollar for receiving,
filing and preserving the same.
4. Any person may appeal from the judgment of the
court, and upon such appeal there may be determined either
or both of the following questions:
(1) Whether just compensation has been allowed for
property appropriated; and

SB 1034 15
(2) Whether proper damages have been allowed for
property prejudicially affected by the improvements.
245.197. 1. Whenever the board of supervisors of any
district now existing or hereafter organized pursuant to
sections 245.010 to 245.280, for and in behalf of the
district, or the owners of twenty-five percent or more of
the acreage of the lands in the district, shall file a
petition with the circuit clerk in whose office the articles
of association were filed stating that there has been a
material change in the values of all or some of the property
in the district since the last previous assessment of
benefits or readjustment of the assessment of benefits, and
praying for a readjustment of the assessment of benefits of
the property identified in the petition for the purpose of
making a more equitable basis for the levy of the
maintenance tax or for the purpose of levying a new tax to
pay the costs of the completion of the proposed works and
improvements as shown in the supplemental plan for
reclamation adopted by the board of supervisors pursuant to
section 245.105, or for both of the aforesaid purposes, the
court wherein the petition is filed, if in session, or the
clerk thereof in vacation, shall fix a date for the hearing
of the petition which date shall not be less than forty-five
nor more than sixty days from the date of the filing of the
petition.
2. The circuit clerk shall give notice to all persons
interested in the lands and property identified in the
petition of the filing and hearing of the petition in the
manner and for the time provided for in section 245.020.
Such notice may be in the following form:

SB 1034 16
[To All Persons Interested in the Following
Described
(insert description of lands and property)
Lands and Property Included Within ______
District:
You are hereby notified that a petition has
been filed in the office of the clerk of
the circuit court of ______ County,
Missouri, praying for a readjustment of the
assessment of benefits for the purpose(s) of
______ ______ ______ ______ ______ and that
the petition will be heard by the circuit
court on the ______ day of ______,
20______.]
NOTICE FOR REASSESSMENT OF BENEFITS
For _____ Levee District.
You are hereby notified that a petition has
been filed in the office of the clerk of the
circuit court of ______ County, Missouri,
praying for a readjustment of the assessment
of benefits for the purpose(s) of ______ and
that the petition will be heard by the
circuit court on the ______ day of ______,
20______. At this hearing, the court will
consider the appointment of commissioners to
perform the readjustment of the assessment
of benefits. Once this report is submitted
to the court, landowners may file objections
which shall be heard and determined by the
court. If you are receiving this notice by
mail, county records indicate you are the
owner of property within the _____ Levee
district.

SB 1034 17
The district last performed an assessment in
________ and the assessed benefits may
significantly change based on a number of
factors including changed use or improvement
of the property since that time. Please
be aware this is a special assessment.
Therefore, the assessed benefits are the
base formula used in allocating the
financial burden for maintenance and
improvement of district improvements.
__________________
Clerk of the
Circuit Court of
______ County,
Missouri.
3. Upon the hearing of the petition, if the court
finds that there has been a material change in the values of
the property in the district identified in the petition
since the last previous assessment of benefits, the court
shall order that there be made a readjustment of the
assessment of benefits for the lands identified in the
petition for the purpose of providing a basis upon which to
levy the maintenance tax of the district or for the purpose
of levying a new tax to pay the costs of the completion of
the proposed works and improvements as shown in the
supplemental plan for reclamation adopted by the board of
supervisors pursuant to section 245.105, or for both of the
aforesaid purposes.
4. Thereupon the court shall appoint three
commissioners possessing the qualifications of commissioners
appointed under section 245.110 to make such readjustment of

SB 1034 18
assessments in the manner provided in section 245.120 with
respect to those lands identified in the petition. The
commissioners shall make their report, and the same
proceedings shall be had thereon, as nearly as may be, as
are provided in sections 245.010 to 245.280, for the
assessment of benefits accruing from the original
construction. In making the readjustment of the assessment
100 of benefits, the commissioners shall not be limited to the
101 aggregate amount of the original or any readjustment of the
102 assessment of benefits, and may assess the amount of
103 benefits that will accrue from carrying out and putting into
104 effect the supplemental plan for reclamation adopted by the
105 board of supervisors pursuant to section 245.105. After the
106 making of the readjustment, the limitation of ten percent of
107 the benefits assessed for the annual maintenance tax which
108 may be levied shall apply to the amount of benefits as
109 readjusted, and the limitation of the tax which may be
110 levied for payment of the costs of the completion of the
111 proposed works and improvements as shown in the aforesaid
112 supplemental plan for reclamation shall apply to the amount
113 of the benefits readjusted.
114 5. There shall be no such readjustment of benefits
115 more often than once in a year. The lists of land and other
116 property, with the readjusted assessed benefits and the
117 decree and judgment of the court, shall be filed in the
118 office of the county recorder as provided in section 245.130.
245.300. No such levee district shall be formed unless
notice of an intention to apply therefor be first given by
publication in some newspaper published in each county
composing said proposed levee district, published once at
least fifteen days before the commencement of the meeting of
the county commission to which said application shall be

SB 1034 19
made, and provided that the commission shall mail[, by
certified mail,] a copy of the notice of the intention to
form a district to the names listed on the county assessor's
records of the owners of land or other individual or
corporate franchise property in the district, including all
public entities owning land within the district.
✓